Nevada, session 83, AB549.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 372, Statutes of Nevada 2023,
at page 2002, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3. Any remaining balance of the appropriations
made by sections 1, 1.5 and 2 of this act must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, [2025,] 2026, by the
entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to
which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any
purpose after September [19, 2025,] 18, 2026, by either the
entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity to
which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September [19, 2025.] 18, 2026.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB549*